Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Charitable Gift Annuity Act:

(1) Charitable gift annuity means a charitable gift annuity described by section 501(m)(5) and section 514(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code that is issued prior to, on, or after March 26, 1996, by a charitable organization that, on the date of the annuity agreement, has been in continuous operation for at least three years or is the successor or affiliate of a charitable organization that has been in continuous operation for at least three years; and

(2) Charitable organization means any entity described in section 170(c) or section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1996, LB 972, § 2.